Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.110

Transfer or assignment of interest by persons with motor vehicles under lease contract or security agreement not subject to prosecution—Enforceability of contract or agreement not affected.

(1) The actual or purported transfer or assignment, or the assisting, causing, or arranging of an actual or purported transfer or assignment, of any right or interest in a motor vehicle or under a lease contract or security agreement, by an individual who is a party to the lease contract or security agreement is not an act of unlawful subleasing of or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle and is not subject to prosecution.

(2) This chapter does not affect the enforceability of any provision of a lease contract or security agreement by a party thereto.

[ 1990 c 44 s 12.]